Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 4. Eligibility and Tuition

§ 1551.
Secondary student eligibility.

A secondary student shall be enrolled in a program of part-time or full-time career technical education at a career technical center if he or she:

applies for the program; and

is accepted into the program by the career technical center.

A secondary student who is eligible to enroll in a career technical center, but who resides in a sending school district, and who so applies, shall be enrolled for academic education in the high school associated with the career technical center if:

the sending school district operates a high school but does not provide daily transportation at its expense to and from the career technical center; or

the sending school district does not operate a high school.

A secondary student who enrolls in a career technical center may enroll part-time in any school to which he or she would otherwise be entitled to enroll for full-time attendance.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 238

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 1551a.
Secondary students not enrolled in a high school.

Enrollment in a high school shall not be a precondition for enrollment in a career technical center for a student of any age without a diploma. For the purposes of this section, a general education development credential shall not be considered a high school diploma.

A school district may establish reasonable procedures to require its resident students to discuss educational opportunities within career technical centers or the high school. Procedures shall not interfere with enrollment in a career technical center. If a student without a diploma who is not enrolled in a high school enrolls in a career technical center, within 10 days of enrollment, the career technical center shall notify the school district of residence of the enrollment.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 1552.
Secondary student tuition.

Each career technical center shall establish a tuition charge for secondary career technical education. The amount shall reflect the actual cost, as defined by rule of the State Board, of attendance in the career technical courses offered by the center. The tuition charge shall be reduced proportionally for students enrolled in a part-time program.

Secondary students are eligible for tuition assistance in career technical education provided in another state when the State Board determines that such career technical education can properly serve the needs of Vermont students.

For students from a school district within Vermont, funds received under subsection 1561(c) of this title shall be subtracted when calculating the tuition charge. For students who are not Vermont residents, funds received under subsections 1561(b) and (c) of this title shall not be subtracted when calculating the tuition charge.

The tuition charged to a school district within Vermont shall be based on the average of the district’s three prior years’ full-time equivalent student enrollment in the career technical center.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 238

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1997, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 10, 25, eff. July 1, 1999, eff. July 1, 1999;

2005, No. 54

, § 11.

§ 1553.
Adult students.

An adult student who is academically qualified for career technical education, who applies and for whom space is available shall be enrolled in a program of secondary career technical education at a career technical center at a rate not to exceed 40 percent of the announced tuition.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 238

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1997, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. April 27, 1998.